Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-347.01
Dismemberment abortion; injunction; cause of action; who may maintain.

(1) A cause of action for injunctive relief against a person who has performed a dismemberment abortion in violation of section 28-347 may be maintained by:

(a) A woman upon whom such a dismemberment abortion was performed;

(b) If the woman had not attained the age of nineteen years at the time of the dismemberment abortion, a person who is the parent or guardian of the woman upon whom such a dismemberment abortion was performed; or

(c) A prosecuting attorney with appropriate jurisdiction.

(2) The injunction shall prevent the defendant from performing or attempting to perform dismemberment abortions in this state in violation of section 28-347.

(3) A cause of action may not be maintained by a plaintiff if the pregnancy resulted from the plaintiff's criminal conduct.

Laws 2020, LB814, § 4.